Washington statutes.
RCW 19.245.010

Automated teller machine—Access fee or surcharge.

(1) The owner of an automated teller machine may charge an access fee or surcharge to a customer conducting a transaction using an account from a financial institution that is located outside of the United States.

(2) "Automated teller machine" means the same as defined in RCW 19.174.020.

(3) "Financial institution" means the same as defined in *RCW 30.22.040.

[ 2005 c 98 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30.22.040 was recodified as RCW 30A.22.040 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.